District of Columbia statutes.
22-932

Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter “vulnerable adult” means a person 18 years of age or older who has a physical or mental condition which substantially impairs the person from adequately providing for his or her own care or protection.

History

June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-301, § 202, 47 DCR 7039